Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.060

Termination of trust in certain property—Property—Parties—Summons.

Two or more delinquent districts and all property, bonds and warrants therein may be included in one action to terminate the trust.

All persons owning any bonds or warrants of the districts involved in the action or having an interest therein shall be made parties defendant except in cases where the bonds or warrants are guaranteed by a local improvement guaranty fund or pursuant to any other form of guaranty authorized by law.

Summons shall be served as in other actions. Unknown owners and unknown parties shall be served by publication.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.53.060. Prior: 1929 c 142 s 1, part; RRS s 9384-1, part.]

NOTES:

Commencement of actions: Chapter 4.28 RCW.